Utah statutes.
35A-9-201.   Intergenerational poverty tracking system -- Data -- Analysis -- Annual report.

(1)  The department shall establish and maintain a system to track intergenerational poverty.

(2)  The system shall:

(a)  identify groups that have a high risk of experiencing intergenerational poverty;

(b)  identify incidents, patterns, and trends that explain or contribute to intergenerational poverty;

(c)  assist case workers, social scientists, and government officials in the study and development of effective and efficient plans and programs to help individuals and families in the state to break the cycle of poverty; and

(d)  gather and track available local, state, and national data on:

(i)  official poverty rates;

(ii)  child poverty rates;

(iii)  years spent by individuals in childhood poverty;

(iv)  years spent by individuals in adult poverty; and

(v)  related poverty information.

(3)  The department shall:

(a)  use available data in the tracking system, including public assistance data, census data, and other data made available to the department;

(b)  develop and implement methods to integrate, compare, analyze, and validate the data for the purposes described in Subsection (2);

(c)  protect the privacy of individuals living in poverty by using and distributing data within the tracking system in compliance with:

(i)  federal requirements; and

(ii)  the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and

(d)  no later than September 30 of each year, provide an annual report on the data, findings, and potential uses of the tracking system to:

(i)  the governor;

(ii)  the Legislative Management Committee; and

(iii)  the Legislature's Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee.



Enacted by Chapter 185, 2012 General Session

